Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-935
University of Nebraska system; role and mission assignments; Board of Regents; adopt policies.

The role and mission assignments enumerated in sections 85-936 to 85-948 shall apply to the University of Nebraska system and its campuses. Such assignments shall prohibit, limit, or restrict only those programs or services provided for under such sections. The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska shall adopt and promulgate policies and procedures necessary to assure compliance with sections 85-917 to 85-966.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 19;

Laws 1989, LB 247, § 23;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 90;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 13.